Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 5

Bonds and Notes

7-82-501. Issuance of bonds or notes.

Each district has the power and is hereby authorized from time to time to issue negotiable bonds in anticipation of the collection of revenues for the purpose of constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, bettering or extending any facility or system authorized by this chapter, or any combination thereof, and to pledge to the payment of the interest and principal of such bonds all or any part of the revenues derived from the operation of such facility, system, or combination of such facility and system. There may be included in the costs for which bonds are to be issued, reasonable allowances for legal, engineering and fiscal services, interest during construction and for six (6) months after the estimated date of completion of construction, and other preliminary expenses, including the expenses of incorporation of the district. Each district has the power and is hereby authorized from time to time to issue revenue refunding bonds in the manner provided for a local government in the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21.

Any utility district that has the power and authority to operate a gas distribution system may borrow money in anticipation of the collection of revenues from such system, and issue negotiable notes to evidence such borrowing for the purpose of financing gas purchases, including storage costs and pipeline capacity costs. Any such notes shall be secured solely by a pledge of and lien on the revenues of such system. The principal amount of notes that may be issued during any twelve-month period shall not exceed sixty percent (60%) of total gas purchases for the same period, and all notes issued during such period shall be retired and paid in full on or before the end of such period. The notes shall be sold in such manner, at such price and upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the board of commissioners of the district issuing such notes. No notes shall be issued under this subsection (b) unless the gas system for which the notes are to be issued has positive net position as shown in the most recent audited financial statements of the system, and the system has produced positive change in net position in at least one (1) fiscal year out of the three (3) fiscal years next preceding the issuance of the notes as shown on the audited financial statements of the system. No notes shall be issued without first being approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. Notes issued pursuant to this section and the income from the notes shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes. If revenues of such system are insufficient to pay all such notes at maturity, any unpaid notes may be renewed one (1) time for a period not to exceed one (1) year, or may be otherwise liquidated as approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

No bond or note authorized by this chapter may be issued until the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or notes, together with a statement as of the beginning of the then current fiscal year, which statement shall show in detail the total outstanding bonds, notes, warrants, refunding bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness of the utility district, together with the maturity dates of the bonds, notes, warrants, refunding bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness, interest rates, special provisions for payment, the project to be funded by the bonds or notes, the current operating financial statement of the district and any other pertinent financial information, shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for review, and the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may report thereon to the utility district within fifteen (15) days from the date the plan is received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall immediately acknowledge receipt in writing of the proposed bond or note issue statement and information. The report thus received by the utility district shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county of the principal office of the utility district, and any other counties that it serves, during the week following the report's receipt. After receiving the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, and after publication of such report, or after the expiration of fifteen (15) days from the date the statement and information are received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, whichever date is earlier, the utility district may take such action with reference to the proposed bond or note issue as it deems advisable. Such report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall also be made a part of the bond transcript.

No provision of this section dealing with the review or approval of any bond or note issued by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, or other state agency, shall apply when the bond or bonds or other evidence of indebtedness of the utility district are to be purchased or the loan is to be made by the farmers home administration or any other direct lending department of the government of the United States.

Prior to the beginning of its fiscal year, any utility district that has issued any debt obligations pursuant to the authority of this chapter shall adopt a balanced annual operating budget that identifies all anticipated revenues of the district by source and identifies all anticipated expenses by type of expense. Such budget shall be based upon historical operating results and reasonably anticipated future operations. The budget as adopted shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for review. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall furnish the utility district a report on such review, which report shall be published in accordance with subsection (c).

If a utility district proposes to sell bonds in excess of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) at a negotiated sale, a written request for proposal must be sent to a minimum of five (5) qualified firms no later than thirty (30) days prior to the first meeting of the board of commissioners to discuss the specific bond transaction. A minimum of three (3) proposals must be received no later than fourteen (14) days prior to such first meeting. This requirement applies to both financial advisory and underwriting services.

Acts 1937, ch., 248, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.35 (Williams, § 3695.34); Acts 1951, ch. 262, § 3; 1963, ch. 104, § 1; 1977, ch. 495, §§ 1-3; 1978, ch. 669, § 1; 1978, ch. 713, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2619; Acts 1985, ch. 38, §§ 1-4; 1987, ch. 422, § 9; 1988, ch. 750, § 37; 1989, ch. 139, § 7; 1989, ch. 221, § 9; 1998, ch. 701, § 1; 2004, ch. 663, § 1; 2010, ch. 868, §§ 24-27; 2011, ch. 392, §§ 14-16; 2015, ch. 140, §§ 10, 11.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (b) substituted “net position” for “retained earnings” near the middle and substituted “change in net position” for “net income” in the fifth sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 140, § 13. April 16, 2015.

Cross-References. Applicability to districts relating to systems or facilities for the transmission of industrial chemicals or natural gas by pipeline, §7-82-302.

Limitation of actions on bonds, §28-3-113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-502. Terms of instruments.

Such bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the board of the district, and may be issued in one (1) or more series; may bear such date or dates; may mature at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates; may bear interest at such rate or rates, which may vary from time to time; may be in such form, either coupon or registered; may be executed in such manner; may be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium; and may contain such terms, covenants and conditions as such resolution or subsequent resolution may provide. The bonds may be issued for money or property and may be sold in such manner and upon such terms as the board shall determine. Pending the preparation of the definitive bonds, interim receipts or certificates in such form and with such provisions as the governing body may determine may be issued to the purchaser or purchasers of bonds sold pursuant to this chapter. The bonds and interim receipts or certificates shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, chapter 3.

If any issue of such bonds is to be sold to an agency of the federal government or an agency of the state, such bond issue may, at the request of such agency, be delivered as an installment bond payable as to principal and interest in equal or approximately equal installments for the term of such bond issue, in accordance with the resolution authorizing such bond issue. Such authorizing resolution shall stipulate the annual principal and interest requirements during the full term of the bond issue.

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of bonds issued or anticipated to be issued under this chapter, at any time during the term of the bonds, and upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the contracts and agreements authorized in this subsection (c) are in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board, as set forth in subsection (e), a utility district, by resolution, may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements under such terms and conditions as the governing body of the utility district may determine, including, but not limited to, provisions permitting the utility district to pay to or receive from any person or entity any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination of the agreement or default under such agreement.

The governing body of a utility district may enter into an agreement to sell bonds, other than its refunding bonds, under this chapter, providing for delivery of the bonds on a date greater than ninety (90) days and not greater than five (5) years, or such greater period of time, if approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, from the date of execution of such agreement or to sell its refunding bonds under this chapter and in accordance with the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21, providing for delivery of its refunding bonds on a date greater than ninety (90) days from the date of execution of the agreement and not greater than the first optional redemption date on which the bonds being refunded can be optionally redeemed resulting in cost savings or at par, whichever is earlier, only upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the agreement or contract of a utility district to sell its bonds, as authorized in this subsection (d), is in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e). Agreements to sell bonds or refunding bonds for delivery ninety (90) days or less from the date of execution of the agreement do not require a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

The state funding board shall establish guidelines, rules or regulations with respect to the agreements and contracts referenced in subsections (c) and (d), which may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The conditions under which such agreements or contracts can be entered into;

The methods by which such contracts are to be solicited and procured;

The form and content such contracts shall take;

The aspects of risk exposure associated with such contracts;

The standards and procedures for counterparty selection, including rating criteria;

The procurement of credit enhancement, liquidity facilities, or the setting aside of reserves in connection with such contracts or agreements;

The methods of securing the financial interest in such contracts;

The methods to be used to reflect such contracts in the utility district's financial statements;

Financial monitoring and periodic assessment of such contracts by the utility district;

The application and source of nonperiodic payments; and

Educational requirements for officials of any utility district responsible for approving any such contract or agreement.

Prior to the adoption by the governing body of the utility district of a resolution authorizing such contract or agreement, a request shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for a report finding that such contract or agreement is in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board. Within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the request, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall determine whether the contract or agreement substantially complies with the guidelines, rules or regulations and shall report on the compliance to the utility district. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finds that the contract or agreement complies with the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board or the comptroller of the treasury shall fail to report within the fifteen-day period, then the utility district may take such action with respect to the proposed contract or agreement as it deems advisable in accordance with this section and the guidelines, rules or regulations of the state funding board. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finds that such contract or agreement is not in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations, then the utility district is not authorized to enter into such contract or agreement. The guidelines, rules or regulations shall provide for an appeal process to a determination of noncompliance.

When entering into any contracts or agreements facilitating the issuance and sale of bonds, including contracts or agreements providing for liquidity and credit enhancement and reimbursement agreements relating to the bonds, interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, other interest rate hedging agreements, and agreements with the purchaser of the bonds authorized under this section evidencing a transaction bearing a reasonable relationship to this state and also to another state or nation, the utility district may agree in the written contract or agreement that the rights and remedies of the parties to the contract or agreement shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation; provided, that jurisdiction over any utility district against which an action on such a contract or agreement is brought shall lie solely in a court in Tennessee that would otherwise have jurisdiction of actions brought in contract against such utility district.

Prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of guidelines, rules or regulations with respect to the contracts and agreements authorized in subsections (c) and (d), a utility district may enter into such contracts or agreements to the extent otherwise authorized in this chapter or in any other law, notwithstanding subsections (c) and (d). Nothing in subsection (c), (d), (e) or (f) is intended to alter any existing authority in this chapter or in any other law otherwise providing authority for a utility district to enter into the contracts or agreements described in subsection (c), (d), (e) or (f) heretofore entered into or entered into prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of guidelines, rules or regulations.

When entering into an interest rate agreement authorized by this section, a utility district may secure its obligations under the agreement, including its obligation for termination or other nonperiodic payments, with the revenues available to secure the bonds with respect to which such interest rate agreement is entered into.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.35 (Williams, § 3695.34); Acts 1969, ch. 282, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2620; Acts 1980, ch. 586, § 1; 1980, ch. 601, § 5; 1999, ch. 428, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 253, § 8; 2004, ch. 589, § 5.

Cross-References. Bonds tax exempt, §7-82-105.

Maximum effective rates of interest, §47-14-103.

Refunding authorized, §7-82-507.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-503. Covenants.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under this chapter may contain covenants, including, but not limited to:

The purpose or purposes to which the proceeds of the sale of the bonds may be applied and the deposit, use and disposition of the bonds;

The use, deposit, securing of deposits, and disposition of the revenues of the district, including the creation and maintenance of reserves;

The issuance of other additional bonds payable from the revenues of the district;

The operation and maintenance of the system or systems;

The insurance to be carried thereon and the use, deposit and disposition of insurance moneys;

Books of account and the inspection and audit of the books, and the accounting methods of the district;

The nonrendering of any free service by the district; and

The preservation of the system or systems, so long as any of the bonds remain outstanding, from any mortgage, sale, lease or other encumbrance not specifically permitted by the terms of the resolution.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.36 (Williams, § 3695.35); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2621.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

Collateral References.

Disposition of revenues from operation of revenue-producing enterprises owned by municipal corporation. 103 A.L.R. 579, 165 A.L.R. 854.

7-82-504. Validity of bonds.

Such bonds bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing of the bonds shall be valid and binding obligations, notwithstanding that before the delivery of the bonds and payment for the bonds any or all the persons whose signatures appear on the bonds shall have ceased to be officers of the district issuing the bonds. The validity of the bonds shall not be dependent on nor affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of the utility for which the bonds are issued. The resolution authorizing the bonds may provide that the bonds shall contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this chapter, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their issuance.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.38 (Williams, § 3695.37); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2622.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-505. Lien — Default — Pledges or security interests — Construction.

There shall be and there is created a statutory lien in the nature of a mortgage lien upon any system or systems acquired or constructed in accordance with this chapter, including all extensions and improvements to the system or systems, or combinations of extensions and improvements subsequently made, which lien shall be in favor of the holder or holders of any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, and all such property shall remain subject to such statutory lien until the payment in full of the principal of and interest on the bonds. Any holder of such bonds or any of the coupons representing interest on the bonds may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, in any court of competent jurisdiction, protect and enforce such statutory lien and compel performance of all duties required by this chapter, including the making and collection of sufficient rates for the service or services, the proper accounting for the collections, and the performance of any duties required by covenants with the holders of any bond issued in accordance with this chapter.

If any default be made in the payment of the principal of or interest on such bonds, any court having jurisdiction of the action may appoint a receiver to administer the district, and the system or systems, with power to charge and collect rates sufficient to provide for the payment of all bonds and obligations outstanding against the system or systems and for the payment of operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenues of the bonds, in conformity with this chapter, and any covenants with bondholders.

Any pledge of, or security interest in, the revenues, fees, rents, tolls or other charges received or receivable by any utility district to secure the payment of any bonds of such utility district, and the interest on the bonds, shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge or security interest is made or granted; the revenues, fees, rents, tolls or other charges so pledged and thereafter received by the utility district or on behalf of any bondholders, together with any tangible property subjected to a security interest by the utility district, shall be subject to such lien as the resolution or other document creating such pledge in favor of the holder or holders of such bonds shall provide. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which any such pledge or security interest or any lien on any of the property of the utility district is created need be recorded.

This subsection (c) shall be in addition to and supplemental to all other provisions of other laws of Tennessee; provided, that wherever the application of this subsection (c) conflicts with the application of such other provisions, this subsection (c) shall prevail.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.37 (Williams, 3695.36); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2623; Acts 1982, ch. 547, §§ 1, 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Utility district operating at a loss. OAG 11-35, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (4/15/11).

7-82-506. Bonds payable from revenue.

No holder or holders of any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall ever have the right to compel the levy of any tax to pay the bonds or the interest on the bonds. Each bond shall recite in substance that the bond and interest on the bonds are payable solely from the revenue pledged to the payment of the bond and that the bond does not constitute a debt of the district within the meaning of any statutory limitation.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.39 (Williams, § 3695.38); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2624.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-507. Reamortization and refinancing.

When any bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to this chapter are held by any federal or state governmental authority or agency, such bonds, to the extent of the principal and interest on the bond outstanding at any time, may be recalled with the consent of such authority or agency and reamortized or refinanced upon such terms as are agreed upon by such authority or agency and as are incorporated in the resolution of the board of commissioners authorizing such reamortization or refinancing. The lien in favor of any holders of such reamortized or refinanced bonds shall continue in favor of such holders with the same priority as existed in favor of such holders prior to such reamortization or refinancing.

Acts 1978, ch. 668, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-2640.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.